Utah statutes.
58-53-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  using the title landscape architect or any other description, words, letters, or abbreviation indicating that the person is a landscape architect if the person has not been licensed under this chapter; and

(2)  engaging in or representing oneself as engaging in the practice of landscape architecture as a corporation, proprietorship, partnership, or limited liability company unless exempted from licensure under Section 58-1-307 or 58-53-304.

